bulgarian.affix
flag *O:
    Е        >      -Е,ЕТО
    Е        >      -Е,ИЯ
    Е        >      -Е,ИЯТА
    Й        >      -Й,И
    Й        >      -Й,ИТЕ
    Й        >      -Й,Я
    Й        >      -Й,ЯТ
    К        >      -К,КА
    К        >      -К,КЪТ
    К        >      -К,ЦИ
    К        >      -К,ЦИТЕ
    О        >      -О,ОВЦИ
    О        >      -О,ОВЦИТЕ
    О        >      -О,ОТО
    Х        >      -Х,СИ
    Х        >      -Х,СИТЕ
    Х        >      -Х,ХА
    Х        >      -Х,ХЪТ

flag *P:
    А        >      -А,АТ
    А        >      -А,ЕЙКИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛО
    А        >      -А,ЕЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ЕН
    А        >      -А,ЕНА
    А        >      -А,ЕНАТА
    А        >      -А,ЕНИ
    А        >      -А,ЕНИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕНИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕНИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕНО
    А        >      -А,ЕНОТО
    А        >      -А,ЕТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХ
    А        >      -А,ЕХА
    А        >      -А,ЕХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕШЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩА
    А        >      -А,ЕЩАТА
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕЩО
    А        >      -А,ЕЩОТО
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,ИЛ
    А        >      -А,ИЛА
    А        >      -А,ИЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ИЛИ
    А        >      -А,ИЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ИЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ИЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ИЛО
    А        >      -А,ИЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ИМ
    А        >      -А,ИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ИХ
    А        >      -А,ИХА
    А        >      -А,ИХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ИХТЕ
    А        >      -А,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕН
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ИМ
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХА
    Я        >      -Я,ИХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ

flag *Q:
    А        >      -А,АЛ
    А        >      -А,АЛА
    А        >      -А,АЛАТА
    А        >      -А,АЛИ
    А        >      -А,АЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АЛО
    А        >      -А,АЛОТО
    А        >      -А,АТ
    А        >      -А,АТА
    А        >      -А,АТАТА
    А        >      -А,АТИ
    А        >      -А,АТИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АТИЯ
    А        >      -А,АТИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АТО
    А        >      -А,АТОТО
    А        >      -А,АХ
    А        >      -А,АХА
    А        >      -А,АХМЕ
    А        >      -А,АХТЕ
    А        >      -А,Е
    А        >      -А,ЕЛ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛО
    А        >      -А,ЕЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ЕМ
    А        >      -А,ЕТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХ
    А        >      -А,ЕХА
    А        >      -А,ЕХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕШ
    А        >      -А,ЕШЕ
    А        >      -А,И
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕН
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ИМ
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХА
    Я        >      -Я,ИХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩОТО
