bulgarian.dict
акламиране/O
ампутиране/O
арсеник/O
ашладисване/O
барване/O
безумствуване/O
бистря/P
благоустройване/O
близня/Q
бойкотиране/O
боравя/P
брануване/O
бръмна/Q
будя/P
бумтене/O
бързоток/O
вадя/P
вариране/O
вглъбя/Q
вдълбя/Q
великомъченик/O
вехна/Q
виене/O
вкаменя/Q
вклещя/P
вкочанясане/O
вледеня/Q
вманиача/P
водене/O
водоснабдя/Q
врачуване/O
вресна/Q
връча/P
всмукна/Q
втасване/O
втъкна/Q
въвличане/O
възвиша/P
възвърна/Q
възкръсване/O
възмездя/Q
възпротивя/Q
възраждане/O
въодушевя/Q
въртокъщник/O
върша/P
геврек/O
гина/Q
гладя/P
глътване/O
гмурна/Q
горя/QS
грабване/O
грапя/P
грейна/Q
грухтене/O
гъзурча/P
гъна/Q
давене/O
деградиране/O
дежуря/P
демобилизиране/O
дефилиране/O
дивя/Q
дискриминиране/O
догаряне/O
догоня/P
доизясня/Q
доказване/O
донося/P
дообмисляне/O
дообясня/Q
допържа/P
доразбиване/O
досрамя/Q
достраша/P
дотрябване/O
дразня/P
дращене/O
дремна/Q
духна/Q
душене/O
дърля/P
еволюиране/O
ексцентрик/O
еретик/O
жонглиране/O
жулна/Q
забавя/P
забраня/Q
забременяване/O
забръщолевя/P
завинтя/P
завиране/O
завърна/Q
загащя/P
заглавикване/O
загоря/Q
заграча/P
загърляне/O
задиря/P
задмина/Q
задъняне/O
заженя/P
зазимя/Q
заинтересуване/O
заклатя/P
заковаване/O
закрепна/Q
закупя/P
закуцане/O
закърша/P
залепна/Q
залутане/O
замеся/P
заметна/Q
заминаване/O
замъгля/Q
занемяване/O
заобля/P
заперча/P
запечатване/O
запладня/Q
запокитване/O
заправя/P
запрегна/Q
запрятане/O
запуша/P
зарасна/Q
заридаване/O
заровя/P
заседна/Q
заситня/P
заскобяване/O
застана/Q
застрашаване/O
застъпя/P
засъхна/Q
затичване/O
заточа/P
затрогна/Q
затурване/O
затъня/Q
затътря/P
захвърчаване/O
зачекна/Q
зачервяване/O
зачерня/P
зашумоля/Q
защуране/O
злосторнича/P
злоупотребя/Q
избиване/O
избистря/P
избухна/Q
избърборя/P
извряскване/O
извърша/P
изгася/Q
издавя/P
издуване/O
издъхна/Q
изженя/P
изкикотя/P
изкомандуване/O
изкормя/P
изкривя/Q
изкъртя/P
излющване/O
измамя/P
измина/Q
измъдря/P
изнервя/P
изнуря/Q
изобразяване/O
изпатя/P
изпиля/Q
изподраскване/O
изпокърша/P
изпраша/P
изпръхна/Q
изпрягане/O
изпъдя/P
изредя/Q
изрепча/P
изседяване/O
изслужа/P
изстена/QX
изтракване/O
изтровя/P
изтръгна/Q
изтътря/P
изхвръкна/Q
изхлузя/P
изходатайствуване/O
изчистя/P
изшумоля/Q
именуване/O
йерарх/O
каня/P
капна/Q
каращисане/O
квася/P
кипна/Q
класифициране/O
клепна/Q
клокотя/P
колосване/O
контузя/P
корабостроене/O
кореня/Q
криволя/Q
кръжочник/O
кръстя/P
кървя/Q
къркоря/P
кьоркютук/O
лепя/Q
лигавя/P
линиране/O
лупна/Q
любезнича/P
мавзолей/O
маскаря/Q
мерак/O
меря/P
миря/Q
млъкване/O
мразя/P
мъждеене/O
мъкна/Q
мърля/P
наближа/PVW
набрашня/Q
навдигане/O
навеся/P
навлажня/Q
нагладя/P
нагорещя/Q
нагощаване/O
надвисна/Q
надвися/P
надничане/O
надплатя/Q
надупча/P
назнача/P
назначаване/O
назърна/Q
накачуля/P
наклоня/Q
накупя/P
накълваване/O
наломя/Q
налуча/P
намразване/O
намръщя/P
намъкна/Q
напаля/P
наплаша/P
наподобя/Q
наподобяване/O
напреча/P
напътя/P
нарина/Q
нарояване/O
населя/P
насладя/Q
настеля/P
настигна/Q
настрадане/O
натопля/P
натопя/Q
натъркаляне/O
нахалнича/P
нацупя/P
начервя/Q
нашиване/O
нащърбя/P
непридържане/O
обагря/P
обваря/Q
обваряване/O
обезводня/Q
обезлюдя/Q
обезпраша/P
обезсмъртя/Q
обещаване/O
обзаложа/P
облагородя/Q
облъча/P
обновя/Q
обрамчване/O
обременя/Q
обруля/P
обхвана/Q
оглавя/Q
огладя/P
огласяне/O
одухотворя/P
одушевя/Q
озадача/P
озеленя/Q
озобване/O
окирливя/Q
окича/P
окуця/Q
окърша/P
оливане/O
омасля/Q
оневиня/Q
опаля/P
описване/O
оплодотворя/Q
опороча/P
опропастя/Q
опуша/P
опущане/O
орося/Q
осеменя/Q
оскрежа/P
оскърбяване/O
ослепя/Q
осъвременя/Q
отавя/P
отвратя/Q
отвръщане/O
отдалеча/P
отдъхна/Q
открехна/Q
откъртя/P
отлагане/O
отморя/Q
отпоря/P
отпочина/Q
отражаване/O
отроня/P
отседна/Q
отсъдя/P
оттласна/Q
отходя/P
отчекване/O
охладя/Q
охлузя/P
ощавя/P
ощетяване/O
пакостя/Q
паяк/O
пердаша/P
пиля/Q
писване/O
пленя/Q
плещя/P
плямпане/O
победя/Q
поверя/Q
поводя/P
повръщане/O
погасна/Q
поговоря/P
погражданя/Q
подвоумя/Q
подгласник/O
подгоня/P
подкожуря/P
подкося/Q
подмазване/O
подмина/Q
поднося/P
подпомогна/Q
подпържа/P
подрастване/O
подремна/Q
подскоча/P
подслоня/Q
подчиня/Q
подшиване/O
поевропейча/P
позаекна/Q
позакърпя/P
позапитване/O
позатихна/Q
поизгладя/P
поизкривя/Q
поизмъчване/O
поизнося/P
поизравня/Q
покатеря/P
покося/Q
покровителствуване/O
половя/Q
положа/P
полулегна/Q
помамване/O
помисля/P
помръдна/Q
понабавя/P
понадигна/Q
понадуша/P
понадушване/O
понаостря/P
понапрегна/Q
понатроша/P
понахапване/O
понижа/PW
поогранича/P
пооживя/Q
поопаря/P
пооплакване/O
поостана/Q
поотегча/P
поотпадна/Q
поочупя/P
попийване/O
попресоля/Q
попрехвърля/P
попяване/O
пораздразня/P
поробя/P
поругаване/O
посветна/Q
поселя/P
посоляване/O
посрамя/P
посръбна/Q
потретя/P
потриване/O
потъна/Q
поуталожа/P
похристиянча/P
почервяване/O
почина/Q
празнословя/P
пребледняване/O
пребуля/P
прегладя/P
прегоря/QS
прегърбяне/O
предвижа/P
предреша/P
прежилване/O
презаредя/Q
прекръстя/P
прелистване/O
премигна/Q
препеня/P
препечатане/O
прерасна/Q
пресиля/P
пресиляне/O
престегна/Q
претърпяване/O
префиня/P
прещипна/Q
привличане/O
приканя/P
прикрепяне/O
примиря/Q
припечеля/P
припокриване/O
присегна/Q
притуляне/O
притъпя/Q
приуча/P
провиня/Q
провиране/O
прокисване/O
прокудя/P
пропадна/Q
пророк/O
просуша/P
противя/Q
протъркване/O
пушек/O
пушна/Q
пържа/P
разбичкане/O
развратнича/P
разгащване/O
разгневя/Q
раздиря/P
разиграване/O
разискря/Q
разложа/P
разлудяване/O
размина/Q
разперя/P
разпищяване/O
разпусна/Q
разрушаване/O
разселя/P
разтроша/P
разтръбяване/O
разхитя/Q
разчуване/O
рекогносциране/O
реша/PR
ритна/Q
руснак/O
самоиздигна/Q
самоизключа/P
самопожертвуване/O
сборя/P
свесване/O
свистя/Q
сграбя/P
сгъване/O
скалъпване/O
скастря/P
скимна/Q
скъсане/O
следя/Q
сложа/P
смиряване/O
смукна/Q
сниша/P
спестовник/O
сплъстя/Q
спотиря/P
спрягане/O
срещна/Q
стилизиране/O
стресна/Q
ступане/O
събеседване/O
съборя/P
съжаля/Q
съприкосновяване/O
съсухря/P
тачене/O
творя/Q
транслиране/O
троша/P
трупна/Q
трясък/O
търколя/Q
увеся/P
угасване/O
угодя/Q
укрепя/Q
умивалник/O
умокря/P
уподобя/Q
урочасане/O
усмихна/Q
уча/P
учетворяване/O
уясня/Q
фрасване/O
хладилник/O
хукна/Q
хуля/P
царевичак/O
цъфна/Q
чаткане/O
чудене/O
чудя/P
шпакловане/O
шумна/Q
